Maine, session 132, LD541.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 22 MRSA §2770 is enacted to read:
§2770. Maine Parentage Act brochure distribution
The Maine Center for Disease Control and Prevention shall create and distribute an
informational brochure answering basic questions regarding the Maine Parentage Act. The
brochure must be distributed to appropriate public health and medical facilities, physicians'
offices and other venues in the State frequented by the general public as determined by the
Director of the Maine Center for Disease Control and Prevention.